tests/v_opt_p3.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "<opt><p3><sg>":
    выля<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : вылин
    кай<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : кайин
    кала<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : калин
    кил<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : килин
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : ҫийин
    ту<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : тӑвин
    вӗре<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : вӗрин
    пуҫла<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : пуҫлин
  
  "<opt><p3><pl>":
    выля<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : вылӗҫин
    кай<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : кайӗҫин
    кала<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : калӗҫин
    кил<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : килӗҫин
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : ҫийӗҫин
    ту<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : тӑвӗҫин
